Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska44-3315
Legal service insurance corporation; legal existence; when commenced.

Upon the issuance of the certificate of authority, and upon the issuance of the certificate of incorporation by the Secretary of State, the legal existence of the corporation organized under sections 44-3312 and 44-3313 shall begin, the articles and bylaws shall become effective, the proposed directors and officers shall take office, and the corporation shall be authorized to transact legal service insurance in this state subject to the requirements and restrictions of sections 44-3301 to 44-3327.

Laws 1979, LB 52, § 15.